Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1368.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Stopping Harmful Image Exploitation and Likeness Deception Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Application." A software application, mobile application, web-based application, computer program, digital tool, artificial intelligence, online service or other digital product or service that may be accessed, downloaded, installed, subscribed to, purchased or otherwise used by an individual."Artificial intelligence." As follows:(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of 123456789101112131415161718 human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:(i) perceive real and virtual environments;(ii) abstract perceptions made under this paragraph into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under subparagraphs (i) and (ii).(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data in order to generate derived synthetic content, including information such as images, videos, audio clips or text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence."Nudification application." An application which utilizes artificial intelligence to alter, generate, manipulate or synthesize an image, video or visual depiction of an identifiable individual to create a realistic depiction of the individual in a state of nudity, removal of clothing from the individual or the individual engaged in sexual acts."Online application marketplace." A digital distribution platform through which applications are offered, sold, distributed, downloaded or otherwise made available to users, including a mobile application store.Section 3. Prohibition of nudification technology.The following are prohibited:(1) A person may not knowingly develop or operate a 20260SB1368PN1774 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 nudification application in this Commonwealth.(2) A person that operates an online application marketplace may not knowingly offer, distribute, sell, license or otherwise make available in this Commonwealth a nudification application or permit a nudification application to be downloaded, installed, accessed, purchased or subscribed to by a user located in this Commonwealth.Section 4. Duty of online application marketplaces.(a) Removal.--(1) An online application marketplace shall remove or disable access in this Commonwealth to a nudification application or service no later than five days after receiving notice that the application being offered is a nudification application.(2) An online application marketplace shall not be in violation of this act if the online application marketplace receives a notice under this section and removes or disables access to the application within five days.(b) Notice.--Notice under this section shall include, to the extent reasonably available:(1) The name of the application or service alleged to be a nudification application.(2) The digital location, listing, link or marketplace page for the application or service alleged to be a nudification application.(3) A statement explaining why the application or service constitutes a nudification application or service.(4) Contact information for the person submitting the notice.(c) Portal for notification.--An online application 20260SB1368PN1774 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 marketplace shall make available an online portal for users to submit notification in accordance with this section.Section 5. Exceptions.This act shall not apply to:(1) A general-purpose image editing, video editing, illustration, animation, film production, design or artificial intelligence tool that is not primarily designed, marketed or used for nudification.(2) A tool used solely for bona fide medical, scientific, educational, cybersecurity, law enforcement, legal, journalistic or public-interest research purposes, provided that the tool is not made generally available to the public for nudification.(3) A service that detects, blocks, reports or removes artificially generated intimate images or nudification applications.Section 6. Enforcement.The Attorney General or appropriate district attorney shall enforce this act.Section 7. Penalties.In addition to any other remedy provided in law, a person who violates this act is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $100,000 for each unlawful download of the nudification application.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260SB1368PN1774 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526